dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX CH Y 81
SFX CH jdti šel .
SFX CH jdti šla .
SFX CH jdti šlo .
SFX CH jdti šli .
SFX CH ti u .
SFX CH ti em .
SFX CH ti eš .
SFX CH ti e .
SFX CH ti emo .
SFX CH ti ete .
SFX CH ti ut .
SFX CH ti eh .
SFX CH ti eše .
SFX CH ti ehmo .
SFX CH ti este .
SFX CH ti ehu .
SFX CH ti i .
SFX CH ti imo .
SFX CH ti ite .
SFX CH ti uči .
SFX CH ti učego .
SFX CH ti učemu .
SFX CH ti učim .
SFX CH ti učem .
SFX CH ti učih .
SFX CH ti učimi .
SFX CH ti uča .
SFX CH ti uču .
SFX CH ti učej .
SFX CH ti učeju .
SFX CH ti uče .
SFX CH ti omy .
SFX CH ti omogo .
SFX CH ti omomu .
SFX CH ti omym .
SFX CH ti omom .
SFX CH ti omo .
SFX CH ti oma .
SFX CH ti omu .
SFX CH ti omoj .
SFX CH ti omoju .
SFX CH ti omi .
SFX CH ti ome .
SFX CH ti omyh .
SFX CH ti omym .
SFX CH ti omymi .
SFX CH ti omo .
SFX CH jdti ševši .
SFX CH jdti ševšego .
SFX CH jdti ševšemu .
SFX CH jdti ševšim .
SFX CH jdti ševšem .
SFX CH jdti ševših .
SFX CH jdti ševšimi .
SFX CH jdti ševša .
SFX CH jdti ševšu .
SFX CH jdti ševšej .
SFX CH jdti ševšeju .
SFX CH jdti ševše .
SFX CH ti eny .
SFX CH ti enogo .
SFX CH ti enomu .
SFX CH ti enym .
SFX CH ti enom .
SFX CH ti eni .
SFX CH ti ene .
SFX CH ti enyh .
SFX CH ti enymi .
SFX CH ti ena .
SFX CH ti enu .
SFX CH ti enoj .
SFX CH ti enoju .
SFX CH ti eno .
SFX CH ti enje/xPxE .
SFX CH ti enja/xPxE .
SFX CH ti enju/xPxE .
SFX CH ti enjem/xPxE .
SFX CH ti enij/xPxE .
SFX CH ti enjam/xPxE .
SFX CH ti enjami/xPxE .
SFX CH ti enjah/xPxE .

SFX CI Y 11
SFX CI 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CI a o/xPxBxO .
SFX CI a y/xPxE .
SFX CI a u/xPxE .
SFX CI ka ok/xPxE .
SFX CI a ě/xPxE .
SFX CI 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CI 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CI a oju/xPxE .
SFX CI 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CI a o/xPxE .

SFX CJ Y 19
SFX CJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX CJ onj nj/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj nje/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 e/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj nja/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 a/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj njev/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj nju/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 u/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj njah/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj njam/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 am/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj njem/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 em/xPxE .
SFX CJ onj njami/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX CK Y 18
SFX CK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CK o o/xPxBxO .
SFX CK ho ši/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šesa/xPxE .
SFX CK o a/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šese/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šij/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šes/xPxE .
SFX CK o u/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šesi/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šah/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šesah/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šam/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šesam/xPxE .
SFX CK 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šesem/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šami/xPxE .
SFX CK ho šesami/xPxE .

SFX CL Y 11
SFX CL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CL a e/xPxBxO .
SFX CL a y/xPxE .
SFX CL a u/xPxE .
SFX CL a 0 .
SFX CL a ě/xPxE .
SFX CL 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CL 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CL a oju/xPxE .
SFX CL 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CL a o/xPxE .

SFX CM Y 17
SFX CM 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CM e e/xPxBxO .
SFX CM e a/xPxE .
SFX CM ce česa/xPxE .
SFX CM ce čese/xPxE .
SFX CM e 0 .
SFX CM ce čes/xPxE .
SFX CM e u/xPxE .
SFX CM ce česi/xPxE .
SFX CM e ah/xPxE .
SFX CM ce česah/xPxE .
SFX CM e am/xPxE .
SFX CM ce česam/xPxE .
SFX CM 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CM ce česem/xPxE .
SFX CM e ami/xPxE .
SFX CM ce česami/xPxE .

SFX CN Y 71
SFX CN ti l .
SFX CN ti la .
SFX CN ti lo .
SFX CN ti li .
SFX CN ti u .
SFX CN gti žem .
SFX CN gti žeš .
SFX CN gti že .
SFX CN gti žemo .
SFX CN gti žete .
SFX CN ti ut .
SFX CN gti žeh .
SFX CN gti žeše .
SFX CN gti žehmo .
SFX CN gti žeste .
SFX CN gti žehu .
SFX CN gti ži .
SFX CN gti žimo .
SFX CN gti žite .
SFX CN ti uči .
SFX CN ti učego .
SFX CN ti učemu .
SFX CN ti učim .
SFX CN ti učem .
SFX CN ti učih .
SFX CN ti učimi .
SFX CN ti uča .
SFX CN ti uču .
SFX CN ti učej .
SFX CN ti učeju .
SFX CN ti uče .
SFX CN gti žemy .
SFX CN gti žemogo .
SFX CN gti žemomu .
SFX CN gti žemym .
SFX CN gti žemom .
SFX CN gti žemo .
SFX CN gti žema .
SFX CN gti žemu .
SFX CN gti žemoj .
SFX CN gti žemoju .
SFX CN gti žemi .
SFX CN gti žeme .
SFX CN gti žemyh .
SFX CN gti žemym .
SFX CN gti žemymi .
SFX CN ti ši .
SFX CN ti ša .
SFX CN ti še .
SFX CN gti ženy .
SFX CN gti ženogo .
SFX CN gti ženomu .
SFX CN gti ženym .
SFX CN gti ženom .
SFX CN gti ženi .
SFX CN gti žene .
SFX CN gti ženyh .
SFX CN gti ženymi .
SFX CN gti žena .
SFX CN gti ženu .
SFX CN gti ženoj .
SFX CN gti ženoju .
SFX CN gti ženo .
SFX CN gti ženje/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženja/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženju/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženjem/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženij/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženjam/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženjami/xPxE .
SFX CN gti ženjah/xPxE .

SFX CO Y 6
SFX CO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CO 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX CO es sa/xPxE .
SFX CO es su/xPxE .
SFX CO es som/xPxE .
SFX CO es se/xPxE .

SFX CP Y 12
SFX CP 0 e .
SFX CP 0 a .
SFX CP 0 ego .
SFX CP 0 u .
SFX CP 0 ej .
SFX CP 0 em .
SFX CP 0 emu .
SFX CP 0 im .
SFX CP 0 eju .
SFX CP 0 i .
SFX CP 0 ih .
SFX CP 0 imi .

SFX CQ Y 62
SFX CQ ti l .
SFX CQ ti la .
SFX CQ ti lo .
SFX CQ ti li .
SFX CQ lěti elju .
SFX CQ lěti eljem .
SFX CQ lěti elješ .
SFX CQ lěti elje .
SFX CQ lěti eljemo .
SFX CQ lěti eljete .
SFX CQ lěti eljut .
SFX CQ ti h .
SFX CQ ti še .
SFX CQ ti hmo .
SFX CQ ti ste .
SFX CQ ti hu .
SFX CQ lěti elj .
SFX CQ lěti eljmo .
SFX CQ lěti eljte .
SFX CQ lěti eljuči .
SFX CQ lěti eljučego .
SFX CQ lěti eljučemu .
SFX CQ lěti eljučim .
SFX CQ lěti eljučem .
SFX CQ lěti eljučih .
SFX CQ lěti eljučimi .
SFX CQ lěti eljuča .
SFX CQ lěti eljuču .
SFX CQ lěti eljučej .
SFX CQ lěti eljučeju .
SFX CQ lěti eljuče .
SFX CQ lěti eljemy .
SFX CQ lěti eljemogo .
SFX CQ lěti eljemomu .
SFX CQ lěti eljemym .
SFX CQ lěti eljemom .
SFX CQ lěti eljemo .
SFX CQ lěti eljema .
SFX CQ lěti eljemu .
SFX CQ lěti eljemoj .
SFX CQ lěti eljemoju .
SFX CQ lěti eljemi .
SFX CQ lěti eljeme .
SFX CQ lěti eljemyh .
SFX CQ lěti eljemym .
SFX CQ lěti eljemymi .
SFX CQ ti vši .
SFX CQ ti všego .
SFX CQ ti všemu .
SFX CQ ti všim .
SFX CQ ti všem .
SFX CQ ti vših .
SFX CQ ti všimi .
SFX CQ ti vša .
SFX CQ ti všu .
SFX CQ ti všej .
SFX CQ ti všeju .
SFX CQ ti vše .
SFX CQ i y .
SFX CQ i a .
SFX CQ i o .
SFX CQ i je .

SFX CR Y 11
SFX CR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CR a e/xPxBxO .
SFX CR a e/xPxE .
SFX CR a u/xPxE .
SFX CR ja ej/xPxE .
SFX CR a i/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CR a eju/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CR a o/xPxE .

SFX CS Y 11
SFX CS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CS a o/xPxBxO .
SFX CS a y/xPxE .
SFX CS a u/xPxE .
SFX CS la ol/xPxE .
SFX CS a ě/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CS a oju/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CS a o/xPxE .

SFX CT Y 53
SFX CT eti l .
SFX CT eti la .
SFX CT eti lo .
SFX CT eti li .
SFX CT eti u .
SFX CT ti m .
SFX CT ti š .
SFX CT ti 0 .
SFX CT ti mo .
SFX CT i e .
SFX CT eti ut .
SFX CT ti h .
SFX CT ti še .
SFX CT ti hmo .
SFX CT ti ste .
SFX CT ti hu .
SFX CT eti i .
SFX CT eti imo .
SFX CT eti ite .
SFX CT eti uči .
SFX CT eti učego .
SFX CT eti učemu .
SFX CT eti učim .
SFX CT eti učem .
SFX CT eti učih .
SFX CT eti učimi .
SFX CT eti uča .
SFX CT eti uču .
SFX CT eti učej .
SFX CT eti učeju .
SFX CT eti uče .
SFX CT ti my .
SFX CT ti mogo .
SFX CT ti momu .
SFX CT ti mym .
SFX CT ti mom .
SFX CT ti mo .
SFX CT ti ma .
SFX CT ti mu .
SFX CT ti moj .
SFX CT ti moju .
SFX CT ti mi .
SFX CT ti me .
SFX CT ti myh .
SFX CT ti mym .
SFX CT ti mymi .
SFX CT eti ši .
SFX CT eti ša .
SFX CT eti še .
SFX CT eti ty .
SFX CT eti ta .
SFX CT eti to .
SFX CT eti tje .

SFX CU Y 2
SFX CU s m .
SFX CU s mi .

SFX CV Y 28
SFX CV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CV y o/xBxPxE .
SFX CV y a/xPxE .
SFX CV y ogo/xPxE .
SFX CV y u/xPxE .
SFX CV y oj/xPxE .
SFX CV y om/xPxE .
SFX CV y omu/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 m/xPxE .
SFX CV y oju/xPxE .
SFX CV y i/xPxE .
SFX CV y e/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 h/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX CV ky čějši/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšego/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšemu/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšim/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšem/zz .
SFX CV ky čějše/zz .
SFX CV ky čějša/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšu/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšej/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšeju/zz .
SFX CV ky čějših/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšim/zz .
SFX CV ky čějšimi/zz .
SFX CV ky čeje/zz .
