dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
najdti/CH
klětka/CI
krabka/CI
ogonj/CJ
uho/CK
kradža/CL
lice/CM
mogti/CN
oves/CO
moj/CP
mlěti/CQ
kanja/CR
mgla/CS
umreti/CT
nas/CU
někaky/CV
ničij/CP
šapka/CI
svoj/CP
prijdti/CH
postupka/CI
čij/CP
rdža/CL
sětka/CI
inočij/CP
nudža/CL
svinja/CR
volja/CR
cibulja/CR
prědojdti/CH
vaš/CP
ustupka/CI
stolka/CI
prějdti/CH
prostitutka/CI
kuhnja/CR
kapja/CR
naš/CP
doska/CI
studnja/CR
rolja/CR
teniska/CI
větka/CI
pustynja/CR
pomogti/CN
tvoj/CP
katka/CI
zemja/CR
medža/CL
trgovja/CR
dynja/CR
pěsnja/CR
čerešnja/CR
čaplja/CR
tetka/CI
večerja/CR
burja/CR
blondinka/CI
bolinka/CI
lěska/CI
jednaky/CV
něčij/CP
lodka/CI
sěmja/CR
betonomešalka/CI
taky/CV
nyrka/CI
razvědka/CI
nikaky/CV
povědka/CI
kupaljnja/CR
kulja/CR
kavarnja/CR
gorečnja/CR
poljanka/CI
šunka/CI
kopaljnja/CR
treti/CT
cukrka/CI
hvilja/CR
žedža/CL
pojdti/CH
vintovka/CI
lěčiljnja/CR
korka/CI
vsaky/CV
čitaljnja/CR
mrazilka/CI
vodka/CI
čestka/CI
sborka/CI
črka/CI
ščetka/CI
košulja/CR
strigti/CN
ostrigti/CN
molnja/CR
ramka/CI
spaljnja/CR
miska/CI
světilka/CI
zapalka/CI
gospodynja/CR
dojdti/CH
sojdti/CH
vozojdti/CH
zajdti/CH
projdti/CH
ujdti/CH
iztreti/CT
dostavka/CI
smlěti/CQ
vrvka/CI
koj/CP
někoj/CP
posylka/CI
izumreti/CT
sotka/CI
sotnja/CR
zagadka/CI
pohybka/CI
kalka/CI
gladovka/CI
zapiska/CI
albanka/CI
amerikanka/CI
indijanka/CI
avtostrahovka/CI
bulgarka/CI
cvekla/CS
čajiljnja/CR
čudžinka/CI
dočerka/CI
gorka/CI
gostiljnja/CR
gradžanka/CI
inaky/CV
izstavka/CI
knegynja/CR
konopja/CR
liceměrka/CI
litvanka/CI
lobanja/CR
madjarka/CI
mučiljnja/CR
nedělja/CR
ozemja/CR
pocěluvka/CI
podpiska/CI
popravka/CI
prěgledka/CI
prěstrělka/CI
skazka/CI
slizgalka/CI
skripka/CI
slovenka/CI
slovjanka/CI
soska/CI
šnurka/CI
tipka/CI
jasnovidka/CI
izgledka/CI
veteranka/CI
založiljnja/CR
budka/CI
diky/CV
glavolomka/CI
najveliky/CV
stryjenka/CI
tetenka/CI
ujenka/CI
nahodka/CI
pikirovka/CI
instruktorka/CI
sědiljnja/CR
portugalka/CI
samoglaska/CI
soglaska/CI
suglaska/CI
vyjdti/CH
sovka/CI
butylka/CI
maněrka/CI
bronja/CR
tvrdža/CL
odědža/CL
kolikoraky/CV
prědrastka/CI
aristokratka/CI
arka/CI
dvuglaska/CI
fialka/CI
galuzka/CI
glaska/CI
gonka/CI
gorělka/CI
grafitka/CI
gubka/CI
hristijanka/CI
izsměvka/CI
knopka/CI
nitka/CI
ostrěgti/CN
podrastka/CI
povrhnja/CR
prěvozojdti/CH
shodka/CI
sadža/CL
seljanka/CI
skrinja/CR
vozrastka/CI
věšalka/CI
vezka/CI
višnja/CR
vrtka/CI
zaključiljnja/CR
žarovka/CI
zorja/CR
žuželka/CI
ovaky/CV
onaky/CV
koliky/CV
seliky/CV
toliky/CV
ovoliky/CV
onoliky/CV
vseliky/CV
inoliky/CV
metla/CS
odkrytka/CI
ovčarnja/CR
prirastka/CI
ulja/CR
bogomolka/CI
legti/CN
ličinka/CI
měrka/CI
mnogoraky/CV
nalegti/CN
nedomolvka/CI
podlivka/CI
polivka/CI
prěmogti/CN
razlegti/CN
mesarnja/CR
pekarnja/CR
podporka/CI
razprja/CR
vpregti/CN
zaponka/CI
zapregti/CN
milja/CR
norka/CI
protreti/CT
rysovanka/CI
strěgti/CN
povezka/CI
nevolja/CR
kukla/CS
marionetka/CI
marka/CI
nakovaljnja/CR
nogavka/CI
fasolja/CR
palatka/CI
čekaljnja/CR
črvenogrlka/CI
zasuvka/CI
pohodka/CI
agitka/CI
aktivistka/CI
akušerka/CI
banja/CR
banka/CI
bezruky/CV
bulka/CI
čečetka/CI
dropja/CR
goltka/CI
gospodža/CL
hodulja/CR
igumenja/CR
iznemogti/CN
jednoruky/CV
jutrenja/CR
kavka/CI
kostka/CI
kovaljnja/CR
kupja/CR
kuznja/CR
laska/CI
laznja/CR
lopatka/CI
lyska/CI
maršrutka/CI
medalistka/CI
mešalka/CI
modistka/CI
nalivka/CI
natreti/CT
neveliky/CV
novinka/CI
obtreti/CT
ocěnka/CI
odstrigti/CN
odtreti/CT
orěhovka/CI
palka/CI
rabynja/CR
razmlěti/CQ
razsylka/CI
raztreti/CT
smogti/CN
sněžinka/CI
vaflja/CR
valerianka/CI
vanilja/CR
vikunja/CR
vodža/CL
vstavka/CI
zakuska/CI
zamreti/CT
zubrovka/CI
bohanka/CI
knigarnja/CR
predža/CL
pokupka/CI
lěvoruky/CV
pravoruky/CV
desnoruky/CV
flotilja/CR
pianistka/CI
vegetarianka/CI
izpregti/CN
vizažistka/CI
izmogti/CN
ruletka/CI
tabletka/CI
gargulja/CR
krevetka/CI
križevka/CI
utreti/CT
pristrigti/CN
topolja/CR
milostynja/CR
šminka/CI
monahynja/CR
primětka/CI
skolzavka/CI
čelja/CR
opatka/CI
poněkoj/CP
sbirka/CI
vsekaky/CV
zatvorka/CI
podkazka/CI
razojdti/CH
freska/CI
pivovarnja/CR
altanka/CI
ljutnja/CR
polusamoglaska/CI
sablja/CR
sosiska/CI
čelka/CI
plěvnja/CR
datulja/CR
rěpka/CI
partnerka/CI
faklja/CR
glavnja/CR
obšivka/CI
suknja/CR
skotobojnja/CR
dupja/CR
kolěbanka/CI
izlegti/CN
kelnerka/CI
afrikanka/CI
iznajdti/CH
marulja/CR
